Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2819
Bodily injuries or wrongful death actions; evidence of medical reimbursement insurance inadmissible; credit against judgment; damages recoverable.

(1) In any action for damages for bodily injuries or for wrongful death when it is alleged that the claimant suffered damages for the cost of medical care, custodial care or rehabilitation services, evidence which tends to establish that the claimant or another person so damaged has been or shall be reimbursed or paid for any such item of damage, cost, or expense, in whole or in part, by any nonrefundable medical reimbursement insurance shall not be admissible in evidence or brought to the attention of the jury, but such nonrefundable medical reimbursement insurance benefits, less all premiums paid by or for the claimant, may be taken as a credit against any judgment rendered. The matter of any credit to be deducted from a judgment shall be determined by the court in a separate hearing or upon the stipulation of the parties.

(2) Damages recoverable in any action shall be those losses which have been or shall be sustained by the claimant as a direct and proximate result of the defendant's wrongful acts as established by a preponderance of the evidence. In wrongful death actions, pecuniary loss to a widow or widower, any dependent, or next of kin shall be subject to all of the terms and provisions of sections 44-2801 to 44-2855.

Laws 1976, LB 434, § 19.